Rhode Island, session 2025, SB555.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-27-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-27 entitled "Motor
Vehicle Offenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-27-4. Reckless driving and other offenses against public safety.
Any person who operates a motor vehicle recklessly so that the lives or safety of the public
might be endangered, or operates a vehicle in an attempt to elude or flee from a traffic officer or
police vehicle, shall be guilty of: a misdemeanor for the first conviction and a felony for the second
and each subsequent conviction.
(1) A misdemeanor for the first conviction; and
(2) A felony for the second and each subsequent conviction.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001671
========